Louisiana, session 2026, HB410.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 7 of Code Title IV of Book III of Title 9 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 9:2790.1 through 2790.4, is hereby enacted to read as
follows:
CHAPTER 7. UNIFORM FRAUDULENT TRANSFER ACT
ALL PARTY NOTIFICATION FOR IN-PERSON CONVERSATION
§2790.1. Legislative findings; declaration of purpose
A. The legislature finds that an individual who engages in a direct
conversation has a reasonable expectation that the conversation is not videoed and
recorded or transcribed unless notice is given, and that the undisclosed preservation
and dissemination of the videos and recordings of these direct conversations
undermines trust, autonomy, dignity, privacy, and fairness in human interactions.
B. Recent incidents have highlighted the misuse of wearable recording
devices such as smart glasses for covertly filming individuals without their
knowledge. These recordings are often disseminated on social media platforms,
leading to harassment and violations of personal privacy.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 410 ENROLLED
C. The purpose of this Chapter is to protect individuals from the
technological preservation and harmful dissemination of direct conversations while
preserving the lawful videoing and recording of public events, legitimate law
enforcement activity, public officials, and videos and recordings made to document
criminal, tortious, or threatening conduct.
D. This Chapter shall not be interpreted to restrict lawful videoing and
recording protected by the Constitution of the United States of America or the
Constitution of Louisiana.
§2790.2. Definitions
For purposes of this Chapter, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Direct conversation" means any in-person oral communication directed
to a specific individual or individuals under circumstances in which a reasonable
person would not expect the communication to be videoed and recorded or
transcribed.
(2) "First responder activity" means videos and recordings or transcriptions
made by a first responder, as defined by R.S. 40:978.1, in the performance of official
duties.
(3) "Law enforcement activity" means videos and recordings or
transcriptions made by a peace officer or other person acting under color of law in
the lawful performance of official duties including but not limited to the following:
(a) Undercover operations that produce videos and recordings made by
undercover officers, confidential informants, and cooperating individuals.
(b) One-party consent videos and recordings conducted as part of an
investigation or intelligence-gathering function.
(c) Body camera recordings or any videoing and recording conducted by or
at the discretion of law enforcement.
(4) "Public or semi-public meetings" mean governmental hearings, press
conferences, public speeches, rallies, or other similar circumstances.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 410 ENROLLED
§2790.3. Notification of videoing and recording direct conversation
A. No participant in a direct conversation shall intentionally use a wearable
eyeglass recording device to video and record or transcribe a direct conversation with
any other participant unless all participants are specifically notified that the
conversation is being videoed and recorded or transcribed.
B. The provisions of this Section do not apply to any of the following:
(1) Public or semi-public meetings.
(2) Law enforcement activity.
(3) Emergencies or first responder activities.
(4) Videos and recordings or transcriptions of a public official made in any
of the following manners:
(a) Of a public official performing an official duty in a public place where
there is no reasonable expectation of privacy.
(b) For the purpose of preserving evidence related to a public corruption
crime as defined in R.S. 11:293.
(c) For the purpose of preserving evidence related to malfeasance in office
as provided in R.S. 14:134.
(5)(a) A person who videos and records a law enforcement officer in the
performance of his official duties while the officer is in a public place or a place
where the private person has a legal right to be.
(b) The exception provided in this Paragraph does not extend to an
individual who physically interferes or materially obstructs lawful law enforcement
activity.
(6) Videos and recordings or transcriptions of a direct conversation made for
the purpose of preserving evidence related to an actual or anticipated civil or
administrative proceeding.
(7) Videos and recordings or transcriptions of a direct conversation made for
the purpose of preserving evidence related to a criminal act or proceeding.
(8) Videos and recordings or transcriptions of a direct conversation made by
a participant in his own residence.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 410 ENROLLED
(9) Recordings or transcriptions made by a participant in his own place of
business or employment.
(10) Recordings or transcriptions made by a participant in his own vehicle
or his employer's vehicle.
(11) Videos and recordings or transcriptions of a conversation if the person
recording or transcribing the conversation is not a participant.
C. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit, modify, expand, or
supersede the provisions of the Electronic Surveillance Act, R.S. 15:1301 et seq.
D. This Chapter shall not apply to incidental, unintended, or background
capture of individuals or conversations occurring in public places where the videoing
and recording are not specifically directed at the individuals.
§2790.4. Penalties
A. Any person who is found to have violated the provisions of this Chapter
shall be liable to an individual for any damages including court costs and reasonable
attorney fees as ordered by the court.
B. A claimant shall demonstrate actual damages resulting from intentional
unlawful videoing and recording and dissemination.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.